Utah statutes.
53-1-203.   Creation of Administrative Services Division -- Appointment of
director -- Qualifications -- Term -- Compensation.
(1)  There is created within the department the Administrative Services
Division.
(2)  The division shall be administered by a director appointed by the
commissioner with the approval of the governor.
(3)  The director is the executive and administrative head of the division and
shall be experienced in administration and possess additional qualifications
as determined by the commissioner and as provided by law.
(4)  The director acts under the supervision and control of the commissioner
and may be removed from his position at the will of the commissioner.
(5)  The director shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter
19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.
